BFN 

<F P=106> [Text of "Strategy for Poland," drafted by Grzegorz Kolodko, </F>
Polish deputy prime minister and finance minister] 
  [Text] 1. The fundamental goals of the systemic 
transformation are increasingly more accepted. While it is 
opening up to the world, Poland is continuing on its road to 
democracy, toward a social market economy, and to the free 
enterprise of ownership sectors possessing equal rights. Due to 
the enormous efforts of all people, who have been supporting the 
reformatory activities of the subsequent governments of the 
Republic, in recent years certain problems have been resolved, 
whereas others have remained unresolved--particularly mass 
unemployment and the increasing internal public debt. Moreover, 
it is a common opinion that more could have been achieved and 
the reforms could have been less painful. Two things prompt 
reservations: the distribution of the cost of the 
transformation and the method of distributing its effects, which 
are still rather limited. The people expressed their views in 
the last elections in this spirit. Therefore, it is of key 
importance for the government to lower the SOCIAL COST OF 
REFORMS, to decrease their onerousness. The phase of the 
transformation that is being carried out now is supposed to make 
the transformation socially acceptable. 
  2. The center-leftist government proposes a new approach to 
the problems society is facing. It does not lie in--as it was in 
the times of central planning--illusionary attempts to include 
in the law almost everything that is to occur in the next few 
years, in establishing new bureaucratic institutions and 
inventing implementation instruments, frequently inefficient; 
nor does it lie in passively waiting for the problems to resolve 
themselves and in making abortive attempts to persuade society 
that the situation is either already good or nothing can be 
done, as has often been done in recent years. 
  Right now we need a program that would take into account the 
trends that are found in the world economy, in science, and in 
technology, trends relating to demographical processes. It must 
anticipate the challenges of a more remote future. It must also 
reinforce the positive processes started as a result of the 
reforms carried out to date. In particular, it must accelerate 
the rate of economic growth and make it permanent. This is why 
today Poland so sorely needs a wider perspective, a STRATEGIC 
CONCEPT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, which would establish three 
priorities: rapid economic growth, systemic and macroeconomic 
stabilization, and an improvement in living standards. The 
government is submitting such a program to the people and will 
be putting it into effect in its long-term interest. It is the 
Strategy for Poland, which marks a new phase of the Polish 
transformation. 
  3. Among the fundamental values upon which the Strategy for 
Poland is based are democratic principles of the DISTRIBUTION OF 
LABOR EFFECTS. Conducive to achieving this goal is the 
formulation of new labor relationships, as well as 
efficiency-oriented and just principles of shaping wages and 
social benefits. These problems were not resolved in the past, 
and they are the source of numerous social protests, which are 
frequently justified. Setting wages and social benefits on the 
basis of the warped mechanism of indexation, despite the 
advanced stage of market reforms that has been reached, results 
in many elements of chaotic bargaining. The intervention of the 
state in the relationships of distribution in enterprises, 
mainly through imperfect fiscal instruments, are in reality 
unjust and work against the market. 
  Therefore, the government is proposing solutions that would 
create a partnershiplike system of labor relationships and wage 
regulation. Giving a new shape to distribution principles, the 
government will take into account both the opinions of people 
and the calculation of economic effectiveness. At the present 
stage of the transformation of the Polish economy, fully 
justified is a decentralized negotiatory mechanism of wage 
regulation, in which the state plays the role of an arbiter that 
settles disputes concerning the conclusion of collective labor 
agreements by representatives of employers and representatives 
of employees, and disputes concerning the observance of those 
agreements. This will offer an opportunity to resolve conflicts 
of economic interests through negotiation. Conflicts of 
interests in the economy occur basically between various social 
groups, not between them and the state or the government. 
Through the system of decentralized negotiation, they must be 
alleviated, so as not to cause political conflicts. 
  4. After a massive economic collapse in the preliminary 
stages of the transformation, QUICK ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT may now 
result in increasing GDP in 1994-97 by approximately 22 
percent--that is, approximately by an average of 5 percent per 
year (in constant prices). Conducive to speeding up the positive 
trends, which have partially been found in the economy since 
mid-1992, will be the policy of mobilizing domestic savings; a 
medium-term financial strategy serves this policy. An 
additional, complementary source of financing the growth will be 
direct foreign investment. The improvement of microeconomic 
allocation efficiency, which adds momentum to economic growth, 
will be to an increasingly greater degree the result of 
structural changes, the acceleration of which is one of the main 
challenges of the present stage of reforms. 
  First of all, the management of state wealth should be made 
more efficient, among other things, through ownership 
supervision of an institutionally isolated State Treasury and 
widely used managerial contracts and agreements concluded by 
state-owned enterprises and tax offices. In addition, ownership 
transformations should be continued, including privatization and 
the National Investment Funds. These solutions serve the purpose 
of treating all of the ownership sectors in the same way. 
  Attempts have also been made to resolve the difficult 
problem 
of property restitution through a system of compensation, in the 
form of bonds exchangeable for the components of denationalized 
wealth (partial privatization). This issue should have been 
settled a few years ago. If we want to seek a social and 
political consensus for today and for the future, we must make 
final decisions and try to answer the following question: To 
what degree are the contemporary generations prepared to pay the 
costs of reprivatization? 
  Conducive to strengthening the development trends will be 
investment in human capital, especially in the improvement of 
the qualifications of management cadres, in the changing of 
employee skills to help them adjust to the altering structure of 
the economy and to the requirements of the labor market, as well 
as in scientific research and health protection. Increasing--in 
real terms--expenditures on education and culture, even though 
they are independent goods, will also result in prodevelopment 
impulses, even though this may happen after seven to nine years. 
It is a remote time; however, it must be present in the policy 
of a responsible government. An additional springboard for 
development is housing programs and investment in the 
infrastructure, especially in the construction of a network of 
super highways, which will yield multiple effects to the economy. 
  5. MACROECONOMIC AND SYSTEMIC STABILIZATION will calm down 
the expectations of economic units--both consumers and 
manufacturers; it will also increase the degree of 
predictability of changes in the economic situation. The 
achievements of the past years concerning macroeconomic 
stabilization should be appreciated, even though this process 
could have been carried out better; this makes it even more 
urgent to complete the stabilization. 
  The first element about it is the need to reduce the rate of 
increasing public debt so that it will not exceed 60 percent of 
the GDP by 2004. Such a threshold has been set by the Maastricht 
criteria, which Poland must strive to satisfy as it is aiming at 
full integration with the European Union [EU]. A rapid increase 
in the GDP enhances opportunities in this area; however, the 
most important thing is to successively limit the budget 
deficit, which dropped from over 6 percent in 1992 to 
approximately 4 percent in 1994; by 1997 it should go down to 
the level of approximately 2 or 3 percent. Toward this end, the 
primary surplus [nadwyzka pierwotna] in the budget (calculated 
without the costs of servicing public debt) will be maintained 
and consistently increased. 
  To reduce this debt, techniques will be used to exchange 
part 
of it for shares in the privatized state wealth. This new 
approach will be conducive to the simultaneous accomplishment of 
three desired goals: reduction of public debt, intensification 
of structural changes, and an influx of new foreign investment. 
Access by foreign economic units to the program of debt 
reduction through its exchange for ownership shares in Polish 
enterprises will be determined by additional financial 
investment, coming from foreign partners, both cash investments 
and commitments to make investment in the future. Thus, the 
government, in a way that is different from methods used in the 
past, will carry out a policy of symmetrical limitation of the 
scope of state wealth on the one hand, and of public debt on the 
other. It would be disastrous to continue the policy that placed 
the previous governments, and, in actual effect, future 
generations, in a situation in which the State Treasury would 
have primarily debts after it got rid of its wealth. 
  Apart from the improvement in efficiency, as the second 
criterion for the privatization policy over the next years, the 
government envisions a striving toward selling state assets in 
line with market principles; special credits supporting Polish 
capital should be provided in this operation. 
  The second element of the policy of macroeconomic 
stabilization is the decreasing of price-induced inflation under 
conditions of full price liberalization. The financial policy is 
supposed to decrease inflation to the one-digit level by 1997. 
Reduction of inflation is not the goal but, rather, a means of 
achieving other direct and indirect goals. In particular, the 
lowering of the rate of price increases and, at the same time, a 
policy of maintaining positive--in real terms--interest rates 
will: 

  -  Encourage all units, especially households, to save money. 
Therefore, revenues derived from interest on bank deposits and 
from interest on deposits in government securities will remain 
untaxed. In addition, some capital profits, even though they 
will be taxed, just as they are in mature market economies, will 
be treated in a preferential manner, similar to the way 
dividends on capital shares in companies are treated 
now. 
  -  Stimulate additional savings, which through the credit 
system and financial markets, will be earmarked for investment, 
which will be increasing faster than the GDP. At the same time, 
thanks to the increasingly more efficient banking system and the 
developing and maturing capital market, allocation efficiency 
will be further improved. 
  -  Effects of a decrease in inflation and 
an increase in investment, reinforced by structural reforms, 
will contribute to the further growth of labor efficiency, which 
will provide momentum to the growth of the GDP and, through a 
decrease in the unitary costs of production, will enhance the 
international competitiveness of the Polish economy. 
  -  Real 
profits in the enterprise sector will increase, in both 
state-owned and privately owned enterprises, which will enhance 
their accumulation capabilities. 
  -  The costs of servicing the 
public debt will decrease--both of servicing the internal debt 
(as a result of a decrease in interest rates) and of the foreign 
debt (by slowing the rate of normal inflation). 

  The third element of macroeconomic stabilization is the 
gradual balancing of the trade balance sheet and of the current 
turnover account so that, in 1997, the balance of this account, 
which is still adverse, can reach the permanent level of 
approximately 1 percent of the GDP. For this purpose, the 
government will conduct a foreign trade policy, including the 
policy of international agreements, which will aim to stabilize 
the import-intensity [importochlonnosc] of the domestic product 
and add momentum to exports. 
  However, there is more to economic stabilization than merely 
the reorganization and balancing of public finances on the path 
of lasting and rapid economic growth. The government is 
consistently stabilizing the rules of the economic game and the 
expectations of units that are participants in this game. 
Entrepreneurs need this, and we are trying to help them--in 
order to decrease their risk. The decisions of the government 
will not come as surprises; however, it will aim to stabilize 
the expectations by means of a consistent financial policy and 
budgetary discipline. Subordinated to this, among others, is the 
medium-term financial strategy of the government, prepared in 
agreement with the National Bank of Poland, concerning monetary 
policy, and discussed with international financial 
establishments--including the IMF. 
  Decisions concerning investment and allocation will then 
have 
a foundation: It will be the predictability of the government's 
activities and stability of the conditions of conducting 
economic activity, especially in the area of financial policy. 
The fiscal system was basically established by the previous 
governments. The task of this government is to complete this 
work, to make the necessary corrections, and to complement it 
(for example, taxation of certain capital income or the system 
of taxes on immovable property); however, the government first 
of all must take the best advantage of the established system to 
finance development. All of this should considerably raise the 
level of economic security of entrepreneurs, managers, and 
employees. 
  6. IMPROVEMENT OF LIVING STANDARDS is the social core of the 
Strategy for Poland. Its successful implementation will make it 
possible to increase the average wage by almost 10 percent 
between 1994 and 1997, and to moderately enhance the purchasing 
power of the average retirement, disability, and other pensions, 
after an approximately 7-percent increase--in real terms--in 
1994. The improvement in living standards will result from the 
rapid economic growth and fairer distribution of the product. 
The distribution of revenues must guarantee everyone at least an 
elementary feeling of social security, the loss of which has 
been the main reason for social frustration in recent years. For 
this reason, the government has undertaken a difficult and 
complex reform of the social security system, which has been 
postponed for several years. The implementation of the plans in 
the area of economic growth offers a chance to carry out this 
reform as effectively and painlessly as possible. Along with 
efforts to transform labor relationships and principles of 
shaping remuneration, these are undertakings of a systemic 
dimension, also aimed at stabilizing expectations. Employees 
need them to stop the forces, independent of them, which decide 
their future. Employees want to see the state establish the 
limits of social regression wherever it still is; they want 
clear conditions and prospects for improving the situation in 
the future. These values will be included in the Charter of 
Social Guarantees, which is being prepared. 
  A program of actively combating unemployment has been 
undertaken; unemployment should drop from the current level of 
almost 16 percent to less than 14 percent by the end of 1997. We 
are slowly entering a phase in which new, often internationally 
competitive jobs will be established more rapidly than the 
liquidation rate of old jobs. This process is still painful to 
people, and it varies with professional milieus. Conducive to 
the improvement of living standards is also the development of 
housing and infrastructure, countering the regional degradation, 
protecting the environment, and increasing the investment in 
human capital. 
  7. In the long run, the gauge of the economic success of the 
Polish people and the source of its cultural progress is 
INTERNATIONAL COMPETITIVENESS OF THE ECONOMY. It also has 
political implications, which serve the purpose of strengthening 
Poland's place in the contemporary world. The position of the 
consumer and the manufacturer is dependent on this 
competitiveness, even though not everyone can see this relation. 
In this context, production for export--as one of the main 
levers that give momentum to the economy and as a source of 
financing imports expenditures and of efficient servicing of the 
foreign debt--will be given systemic preferences, especially 
financial ones. In the next few years, the rate of exports 
growth will be almost 50 percent higher than the growth rate of 
the domestic product. 
  One of the instruments of the policy that improves the 
competitiveness of Polish manufacturers on the domestic market 
in the medium term and that is conducive to the improvement of 
the position of the Polish industries on world markets in the 
long term will be the increasing inflow of foreign capital, 
especially the inflow of private direct investment. Stable and 
favorable conditions are being created for these investments, 
which, from a strategic point of view, is of greater importance 
than short-term fiscal licenses. Also, on this level, the 
principle of granting equal rights to sectors will be used. 
  8. Poland is and has always been part of Europe. It is only 
natural, therefore, for it to strive toward RAPID INTEGRATION 
WITH THE EU. However, despite the financial support Poland has 
been given, the integration experiences of the past three years 
have not been totally satisfactory. The association treaty 
recognized the need for asymmetry in the mutual liberalization 
of trade due to the fact that we had to face more difficult 
tasks in the area of restructurization of our economy. However, 
it was not Poland but the EU that went from a deficit to a 
surplus, especially in trade in agricultural products and 
processed food. 
  Polish manufacturers often have to deal with dishonest 
competition of subsidized West European goods on both the 
domestic and the international market. The historic decision 
made in Copenhagen in June 1993 accepting the future membership 
of Poland and other associated states in the EU has not yet been 
backed by any major steps that would encourage this integration 
and openness of those markets to our exports. The time is 
drawing near when our striving for participation in the EU must 
meet with a greater openness of the markets of the EU states. As 
for ourselves, we are intensifying adjustment activities, 
especially in agriculture. 
  9. REFORM OF THE ECONOMIC CENTER is a necessary condition 
from the standpoint of efficiency in the implementation of the 
Strategy for Poland. It is a program constructed from the 
standpoint of problems and functionality, not from the 
standpoint of the ministries. The decisionmaking center should 
be subordinated to the main policy of the government. The 
present configuration of the ministries, central offices, and 
agencies does not satisfy this requirement. Therefore, the 
economic center will soon be reorganized; this reorganization 
will lie, among others, in the establishment of a strong, 
institutionally isolated State Treasury, Ministry of Economy, 
and a Ministry of International Economic Integration. This will 
functionally strengthen and at the same time slim down the 
economic center by making it possible to take better advantage 
of the cadres and by making the steering of the economic 
processes more efficient. The management of these processes will 
be successively decentralized. 
  Ten key programs are an integral part of the Strategy for 
Poland. They are of a problem-functional nature. In addition, 
the government's packet includes a set of sector and ministerial 
programs, as well as economic and social policies, for the 
implementation of which appropriate ministries are responsible. 
The Strategy for Poland imposes certain defined tasks on the 
economic ministries and focuses on the key problems as well as 
on the macroeconomic and macrosocial approach. The 
implementation of these ambitious and difficult tasks will not 
only prevent us from undoing the achievements of the past years, 
but will also limit or eliminate the failures of those periods. 
  First of all, however, it will give momentum to the Polish 
economy and will provide a reward for the effects of the hard 
work that will have to be done by all of us, for which the 
government is supposed to create the proper conditions. This is 
why the efforts of the previous governments to decrease the 
participation of the state in the state's economy and to carry 
out the processes of demonopolization and deregulation of the 
economy will be continued. 
  10. Historical experience of those countries that have 
already achieved economic successes clearly indicates that the 
source of success has always been the hard work of society and a 
wise policy of the governing elites. Strategy for Poland defines 
the framework within which the policy in the present stage of 
the historic process of the transformation of the Polish economy 
and society is being carried out. A necessary condition to put 
it into effect, to give it momentum, and to create the right 
conditions for social and economic development in a more remote 
future--also under next democratically elected governments--is 
PEACE AND QUIET. Therefore, the government is continuing efforts 
to strengthen external and internal security and to subordinate 
foreign policy to the interests of the Polish state. 
  What is also needed is a lasting social peace. The 
government 
cannot work creatively under conditions of instability and 
uncertainty of expectations. After some time, the very results 
of the Strategy for Poland will ensure such a peace to an 
ever-greater degree. Today, however, we also need the goodwill 
of all proreform forces. They attract an immense amount of 
social energy. It must be focused on a creative future-oriented 
effort. Agreement must be reached on the Strategy for Poland 
because our country is worth it. 
<H5>  THE KEY PROGRAMS </H5>
  I. Partnershiplike labor relations and negotiation mechanism 
of wage regulation. 
  II. Reform of the social security system. 
  III. Combating unemployment. 
  IV. Development of rural areas. 
  V. Investment in human capital. 
  VI. Managing state wealth and ownership-transformation 
processes. 
  VII. Medium-term financial strategy. 
  VIII. Development and reform of the financial sector. 
  IX. Security of economic transactions and absorption of the 
"gray market." 
  X. International competitiveness of the Polish economy. 
<H5>  * * * </H5>
  I. PARTNERSHIPLIKE LABOR RELATIONSAND NEGOTIATION 
MECHANISMOF WAGE REGULATION 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The incoherency and defects of present solutions concerning 
labor relations can be seen first of all in the increasing 
number of collective bargaining cases and the multiple aspects 
of negotiations held in various organizational configurations, 
frequently without any legal authority. Even if they result in 
some agreements, they most often do not last long. Equally 
ineffective are instruments used by the state in the sector of 
public enterprises and in the budget sphere--the centralized 
and, in fact, administrative instruments of wage regulation, a 
subject of chaotic bargaining. In the sector of privately owned 
companies, in turn, the conditions of work and wages are 
frequently unilaterally imposed by the employer, to the 
detriment of employees and the budget. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  Political nature of disputes and conflicts over wages, 
organizational chaos and chaos concerning powers, which can be 
seen in the course of such conflicts, increasingly smaller 
social acceptance of the growing wage gaps--all of this leads to 
social frustration and political destabilization. As a result, 
the government has decided to take on the following far-reaching 
goals. These goals go beyond the near future; they require time, 
consistency, and patience from all of the parties of the labor 
relationships: 
  1. Creation of modern labor relations. 
  2. Establishment of a mechanism for wage regulation that is 
socially and economically effective and that, therefore, is 
decentralized and based on negotiation. 
  3. Achievement of a situation in which the state plays the 
role of an arbiter that settles disputes concerning the 
conclusion of collective labor agreements by representatives of 
employers and employees, and concerning the observance of those 
agreements. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  The government will take complex measures that will make it 
impossible to shape labor and wage policy in the state through 
short-term decisions, which are a reaction to chaotic political 
impulses. The most important instruments in this area are: 
  1. Amendment of the Labor Code, which makes it possible to: 
  --Conclude collective labor agreements on the level of the 
enterprise, branch, and the branch-enterprise. Regulations will 
determine the substantive scope of the agreements, and parties 
will be entitled to conclude them; the regulations will also 
specify the clause of social peace, which will not allow 
collective bargaining to start when the agreement is in force. 
  --Specify the criteria and principles of assessing the 
representativeness of trade unions and organizations of 
employees on the branch and regional level. 
  --Abandon variations of the legal regulation of labor 
relations--variations regarding the ownership sector. 
  --Impose on the employer the duty of notifying the employee 
about the reason for an intended layoff; the employee should be 
guaranteed the right to submit reservations. 
  --Impose on employers who take over enterprises (in part or 
in whole) the duty of maintaining, for a specified period of 
time, the rights the employees of the taken-over enterprise have 
acquired in the enterprise so far. 
  --Adjust the leave law to the requirements specified in 
Convention 132 of the International Labor Organization (among 
others, to increase the minimum number of leave hours, to 
establish legal guarantees making it possible to go on leave 
every year, to see to it that the leave regulations no longer 
fulfill a disciplinary function). 
  --Extend the privileges of employees, who are the only 
people 
taking care of small children, to male employees as well. 
  --Stop treating the formal discipline of work as an element 
of legal regulation of labor relations and eliminate the norms 
of a restrictive nature from the Labor Code. 
  --Prohibit an employee from conducting activity counter to 
the interests of the employer during the period of employment 
and within a year following it. 
  2. Establishment of enterprise councils as above-union 
employees' organs entitled to conclude collective agreements; 
the councils would be elected in democratic elections, in all 
enterprises--both public and private--that employ more than 20 
persons. 
  3. Equipment of judicial organs with the right to settle 
disputes related to the conclusion of collective agreements 
(among others, as far as the branch and territorial scope of the 
effectiveness of agreements is concerned) and with an effective 
instrument enabling them to impose sanctions on the parties of 
the collective labor relationships. 
  4. Change in the status of state-owned enterprises, which is 
aimed at making it possible for their management to act in the 
role of an autonomous party to the labor relationship. 
  5. Amendment of a packet of laws: on trade unions, on 
employer organizations, and on resolving collective bargaining 
cases, as well as the adoption of such an interpretation of them 
that could guarantee a balance to the parties of the labor 
relationship. 
  6. The government supports the idea of strengthening the 
economic self-government and other forms of professional 
self-government; it will initiate the introduction of legal 
solutions that will prevent these organizations from turning 
into oligarchical interest groups, capable of imposing their 
will on the public administration at the cost of other social 
groups, especially consumers. Therefore, because control and the 
effectiveness of the influence on decisionmaking must be ensured: 
  --All units, the interests of which may be violated by the 
resolutions of the organs of the economic self-government, will 
be given the right to file lawsuits against these resolutions. 
  --Obligatory membership in the organizations of the 
occupational self-government will be abolished. 
  7. The status of the Trilateral Commission for Socioeconomic 
Affairs, which acts at the central level, will be regulated by a 
legal act. Apart from opinion-issuing powers in such areas as, 
for example, reform of the pension system or the mechanism of 
wage regulation in the budget sector, the commission will also 
be equipped with the right to launch a legislative initiative 
the content of which would bind both parties--that is, they 
would be obliged to support this initiative in parliament. This 
concerns issues that must be resolved at the central level, 
which are well-defined and focus the activities of 
well-organized and isolated interest groups. 
  Introduction of the above-mentioned solutions that 
contribute 
to the creation of a new labor system is an urgent matter that 
will be finally decided as early as in 1994. However, the actual 
implementation of these solutions will require extensive 
training and educational activities, which will be implemented 
jointly with trade unions and employer organizations. The 
financing of these undertakings will be ensured primarily by 
resources derived from foreign assistance. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. The barriers and possibilities of economic development, 
especially the requirements of international competitiveness. 
  2. Lack of progress in restructuring the economy 
(particularly in the ownership, organizational, substantive, 
technological, and regional area) is an increasingly more 
serious source of inflation. Therefore, activities related to 
the establishment of partnershiplike labor relations and a 
negotiation mechanism of wage regulation are aimed at resolving 
the key problem of economic development right 
now--restructuring, especially industrial and regional 
restructuring. If these efforts were not made or if incorrect 
aims were set, the transformation that is under way might 
regress, which would be independent of the macroeconomic policy 
that is being carried out. 
  3. The need to employ extraordinary administrative measures 
of wage control resulting from the continuation of uncoordinated 
and incoherent activities and decisions concerning wages. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  A drop in the number of working days lost by the economy as 
a 
result of strike activities. 
  II. REFORM OF THESOCIAL INSURANCE SYSTEM 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The implementation of the strategic intentions of the 
government--economic growth, leading to an improvement in the 
living standards of citizens--is not possible without 
appropriate transformations in the social arena. Right now the 
burden placed on the budget and the inefficiency of the existing 
system may soon cause public finances to collapse, which would 
undo the reform efforts that have been made so far. The existing 
system does not allow for the exercise of effective controls 
over the method of subscription collection and does not 
guarantee appropriate receipts in the budget; moreover, it is 
frequently an element of political bargaining. From the point of 
view of citizens, the system is inefficient and unfair, as 
well--very often it is those who need help the most who do not 
receive appropriate assistance, and, instead, people who should 
not take advantage of these benefits actually get them. 
  A complex reform of the social insurance system, understood 
as social insurance, health protection, and unemployment 
protection, is thus not a matter of choice but an absolute 
necessity. In the long run, there is no alternative here; 
however, there is a historical necessity, resulting mainly from: 

  -  A systematic decrease in the relation of the people paying 
subscriptions to the existing insurance system to the number of 
people taking advantage of the benefits. According to forecasts, 
this trend will be maintained in the coming years, as well, when 
the processes of ending the professional activity of generations 
of the postwar demographic explosion coincide with the 
professional activation of the generations of the population 
slowdown of the second half of the 1980's and the beginning of 
the 1990's. 
  -  An increase in the subscription level from 15.5 
percent (1970's) up to 48 percent of the remuneration; in 
addition, these payments should be already 9-percent higher to 
provide money for the expenditure on employee retirement 
pensions and other pensions--so that this additional money would 
not have to be provided to the Social Insurance Fund [FUS] by 
the budget. 
  -  Lack of a possibility for the budget to bear the 
present burden related to the financing of the budget 
sphere. 
  -  The decreasing of the health condition of the citizens. 

  The present government considers the systemic resolution of 
the issue of social insurance to be one of the priorities of its 
activities. Taking as much advantage as possible of the 
conclusions resulting from the work conducted by previous 
cabinets, the government is preparing a complex concept of 
reforms in this sphere; preparations are under way to implement 
it. There is an awareness, however, that it may take from 10 to 
20 years to complete the entire process of reforms. 
Simultaneously, steps are being taken to enhance the efficiency 
of the existing system so that the danger of an overall collapse 
in the social sphere will be avoided and the sphere will be 
gradually adjusted to the transformation requirements. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  1. Consolidating the social insurance system, understood as 
the evaluation of the effectiveness of the benefits from the 
standpoint of social policy, and, in well-founded cases (for 
example, subtracting the subscription from the gross salary), 
changing their character. 
  2. Decreasing the system's tendency to create conflicts, 
through an improvement in its clarity (among others, concerning 
the principles of financing and the share of the budget in 
expenditures) and individualizing the accounts of the individual 
participants of the system (the state of the account is the sum 
of accumulated subscriptions and benefits), as well as 
introducing retirement funds. 
  3. Improving the overall effectiveness of the functioning of 
the system (self-financing, rationalizing the level and scope of 
benefits, enhancing the quality of the services in the sphere of 
health protection). 
  4. Gradually decreasing the insurance subscription 
(currently 
49 percent, along with the Labor Fund) down to a level 
comparable to the world level (approximately 25 percent). 
  5. Decreasing the scale of involvement in the state budget. 
  The achievement of these goals calls for an overall concept 
of reform of the social insurance system. The government has 
such a concept and will begin implementing it; in doing so, it 
will take into account the opinions of the people--that is, it 
will see to it that measures going against the feeling of 
security of the people, which is rather weak already, are not 
taken. 
  Following are the main elements of the concept of the social 
insurance system reforms: 
  1. Complexity--that is, introduction of changes in five 
areas 
of the system: 
  --Pension insurance. 
  --Sickness benefits. 
  --Health insurance. 
  --Insurance for accidents at work and occupational diseases. 
  --Unemployment insurance. 
  2. Gradualness of the changes in the system--from a 
redistribution (repartition) system, based on the financing of 
benefits from current payments and contributions from the 
budget, to an insurance system (with elements of 
redistribution), whose structure and financing will be based on 
principles determining the activity of insurance companies 
(following the model of most such systems that exist in the 
world), particularly as regards the individually paid 
subscriptions and individually paid benefits. As a result, the 
level and scope of the benefits will vary with the size of 
subscriptions paid and with the period of their 
payment--benefits exceeding the period guaranteed in the general 
insurance will be included in the nonmandatory insurance. 
  3. Achieving a situation in which the social insurance 
system 
includes the following mutually complementing subsystems: 
  --A fundamental, state-guaranteed subsystem of social 
insurance, paid jointly by employers and employees, or, in some 
cases, by the state; the size of the benefits in this subsystem 
will depend on the size of the subscriptions and the period over 
which they are paid. 
  --A fund subsystem, based on individual or group savings, on 
participation in retirement pension funds and commercial 
insurance, which is functioning on the market (services for the 
latter are provided by banking and semibanking establishments, 
as well as by commercial insurance companies). 
  --A health insurance subsystem. 
  --An unemployment insurance subsystem, subject to the 
"Subject of the policy of social insurance." 
  A fundamental reduction in the degree of the system's 
dependence on the central budget. The intention is to finally 
eliminate most of the subsidies that have been extended so far 
and replace them with the principle of linking the size of the 
benefit strictly and individually to the size of the burdens 
borne earlier by the citizen and the employer. 
  Maintenance of the budget as an indispensable and important 
source of additional financing of some of the costs of the 
functioning of the social sector (for example, the construction 
and maintenance of the infrastructure for health protection, 
preventive care, social assistance for the poorest groups of 
society, intervention activities in the sphere of unemployment). 
Until the final version of the system is fully mature, it will 
function mostly at the level of the fundamental system. 
  In the transitional period, when a mixed system is 
functioning, all of the hitherto benefits and privileges 
obtained by pensioners will be maintained. 
  Emergence of retirement pension funds and insurance 
companies, as well as a gradual increase in their role in the 
financing of benefits under strict control by the state, 
especially in the area of investing their resources, 
particularly in the conditions of the competition of retirement 
funds. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  Between 1994 and 1997, the government will take the 
following 
steps, leading to the implementation of the outlined concept: 
  1. The law on the financing and the organization of social 
insurance, as well as the law on the Social Security Agency 
[ZUS], will be changed. 
  2. The "subject of the social insurance policy" will be 
established; it will deal with the individual calculation of 
subscriptions and benefits; it will also exercise supervision 
over social insurance establishments. 
  3. There will be an individualization of the accounts of the 
individual participants in the system. 
  4. Principles of paying subscriptions by employers and 
employees will be introduced; they will make it possible for any 
interested party to control the state of the account, as a 
result of which privately owned and state-owned enterprises will 
be more disciplined in paying their subscriptions. This, in 
turn, will increase budget receipts. 
  5. Identification cards for all citizens will be introduced, 
on the basis of which events influencing the state of the 
account of every insured person will be registered. 
  6. Legal, institutional, and organizational framework for 
the 
functioning of retirement funds and insurance companies will be 
created. 
  7. The present tax system will be modified in such a way as 
to make it possible for employees and employers to include their 
insurance subscriptions in the costs of obtaining incomes. 
  8. Steps will also be taken to establish order in the 
present 
system and to enhance its clarity by: 
  --Eliminating undue benefits from the portfolio. 
  --Controlling and rigorously executing payments, as well as 
decreasing the amount of overdue payments and, in effect, 
increasing the number of those who pay their subscriptions (for 
example, noncash settlements or inclusion of the subscription in 
the first installment [transza] of the tax). 
  --Decreasing the number of those who are entitled to 
retirement benefits by prolonging the required employment 
period, equating the retirement ages of men and women, and 
sharpening the principles of obtaining earlier retirement rights. 
  --Complementing the regulations concerning the possibility 
of 
suspending benefits if a certain income level is reached in the 
case of people who continue (take on) work after obtaining 
retirement rights. 
  --Changing the principles of the valorization of pensions 
(departing from indexation in relation to wage movements in 
favor of adjustments to price changes). 
  --Decreasing the number of people receiving invalid pensions 
by making painstaking diagnoses of health conditions, placing 
emphasis on rehabilitation before a pension is granted, 
sharpening the criteria for granting invalid rights (especially 
for people who have maintained the ability to work, for example; 
liquidation of the third invalid group; change in the judicial 
decisions concerning invalids--a bill that is being prepared by 
ZUS), and by undertaking active preventive-rehabilitative 
activities aimed at improving health conditions and restoring 
professional activity. 
  --Excluding from FUS the benefits for which subscriptions 
are 
not paid and benefits of social character. 
  --Regulating the payments of peasants to KRUS [expansion 
unknown]. 
  --Uniforming the principles of paying sickness and maternity 
benefits in all sectors of the economy. 
  --Limiting the antimotivational character and enhancing the 
effectiveness of the solutions in the sphere of social 
protection for the unemployed, including pressure on control 
over access to benefits and giving a motivational character to 
their scope, form, and size. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. Lack of the will or of the political possibilities to 
implement the above-outlined changes. 
  2. Blunting of the crux of reforms through compromises, 
stopgap measures, and substitute solutions. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  Decrease in the share of the expenditure on social insurance 
in the expenditures of the budget. 
  III. COUNTERACTING UNEMPLOYMENT 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The mass unemployment in Poland affects 3 million people, 
and 
the unemployment rate amounts to almost 16 percent, which is one 
of the highest rates in Europe. A characteristic feature of 
Polish unemployment is its considerable regional variation. In 
the areas of some large agglomerations, the unemployment rate 
ranges from 5 to 8 percent, whereas, in regions of deep economic 
depression, it reaches as much as 40 percent of the total number 
of occupationally active people. 
  Other important characteristics of Polish unemployment 
include a high percentage of young people (approximately 35 
percent), as well as the percentage of people chronically 
unemployed (approximately 45 percent of people do not have a job 
for over 12 months). Over 50 percent of the registered 
unemployed lost the right to unemployment benefits, along with 
the rights that are granted to employed people, including health 
insurance benefits. There is a real danger that unemployment may 
enter a chronic state. 
  The size and characteristics of unemployment place this 
phenomenon among the most important and the most difficult 
economic, political, and social problems. In addition, it is a 
new threat and not known to two successive generations of Poles. 
Therefore, there are neither individual nor collective 
experiences in dealing with unemployment; nor is there a network 
of social organizations that would be supported by an efficient 
public administration and the goal of which would be to combat 
unemployment. 
  The evaluation of the medium-term prospects for economic 
development suggests that, over the next few years, even if we 
achieve a high, over-10-percent rate of economic growth, we 
cannot expect a considerable drop in the unemployment level, 
mostly because of: 

  -  A defective structure of employment that is not adjusted 
to the requirements of a modern market economy. 
  -  Excessive 
employment in many public enterprises, which, in order to 
effectively compete with others, must be modernized, which 
entails the need to lay off large numbers of redundant 
employees. 
  -  A considerable demographical increase in the amount 
of labor force. 

<H5>  II. THE AIMS </H5>
  The approach to the problem of unemployment is dramatically 
changed. The government will go over from a passive policy, 
consisting mainly of providing social protection, to an active 
policy, the intention of which is stimulating the process of 
creating new jobs as well as protecting public finances. 
  Therefore, the government has set the following goals: 
  1. Successively lowering the unemployment rate, especially 
between 1995-97. 
  2. Combating chronic unemployment and the afflictions 
accompanying it. 
  3. Decreasing the unemployment scale among young people. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  To achieve these goals, measures are being taken to: 
  1. Strengthen the proinvestment policy conducive to creating 
new jobs. 
  2. Link more closely the modernization and restructuring 
programs to the situation in the labor market. 
  3. Use a variety of active methods to stimulate employment, 
particularly in regions characterized by a high unemployment 
rate, including resources that enhance the mobility of employees 
and unemployed people. 
  4. Introduce changes in the system of social protection of 
the unemployed; changes should both strengthen this protection 
and limit the antimotivational effects of the present solutions. 
  Large-scale investment undertakings related to the 
modernization of the technical infrastructure of the country and 
initiated by the government will be conducive to increasing the 
demand for work. These investments will concern, among others: 
  1. Modernization of the road network and the construction of 
super highways. 
  2. Development of telecommunications. 
  3. Modernization of the railroads. 
  4. Development of the gas supply system. 
  Therefore, detailed programs are being prepared and 
implemented, such as the governmental program for the 
construction of fast roads and superhighways, modernization of 
the railroads, and development of telecommunications and a gas 
supply system. 
  A number of sector-specific restructuring programs are now 
in 
the advanced stages. Setting these programs in motion and 
implementing them will allow for the economic and social 
consequences of changes in the demand for labor. A considerable 
portion of the resources earmarked for these programs will be 
used to change the qualifications and skills of laid-off 
employees and for their occupational activation. 
  A chance to limit unemployment and minimize its social 
consequences will be offered by the establishment of special 
economic zones on the basis of enterprises rich in technical 
infrastructure, the production property of which is not fully 
utilized, and that have highly qualified cadres at their 
disposal. Work is under way to implement such a program in 
Mielec. 
  One of the evaluation criteria of privatization undertakings 
is the protection of jobs. This requires that contacts [as 
published] take into account not only clauses concerning the 
level of guaranteed employment but also investment commitments, 
the implementation of which will, in the long run, allow the 
maintenance of existing workplaces and the creation of new ones. 
  The policy of counteracting unemployment will be implemented 
to a considerable degree at the regional level; however, the 
government will sharpen the criteria of including local labor 
markets in the group where special activities are conducted. In 
those areas, the instruments that are supposed to result in an 
increase in employment will be reinforced and concentrated. They 
will consist, among others, in the following: 
  1. Permission for the quicker amortization of fixed assets. 
  2. Tax allowances for training employees and apprentices by 
individuals conducting economic activity. 
  3. An increase in the employment limit that does not cause 
the loss of rights to pay taxes in the form of the tax charter. 
  4. Periodic tax allowances for investment expenditures. 
  5. Credit guarantees for small and medium-sized enterprises. 
  6. The sending of unemployment benefits directly to the 
employers who employ them. 
  7. Employment of young people who have finished their 
education in occupations that are locally useful. 
  8. A decreasing of work hours in order to increase the 
number 
of employed people (in close cooperation with trade unions). 
  Because of regional variations in the conditions and sources 
of high unemployment, there is a need to apply a packet of 
solutions adjusted to the unique situation of the various 
endangered areas. Such packets (the purpose of which, for 
example, is to stimulate economic growth in regions 
characterized by a collapse in other-than-agricultural sectors 
of the economy, domination of nationalized agriculture, or 
domination of traditional or obsolete industries) will be the 
basic instrument for the state's regional policy. 
  Programs, the purpose of which is to educate people or 
change 
their qualifications, will first of all contribute to an 
increase in the mobility of unemployed people; that is, they 
will contribute to the shortening of the period of occupational 
inactivity. 
  1. The government will want closer cooperation between 
employers' organizations, occupational training establishments, 
and unemployment offices. Especially desirable are training 
courses organized at the request of employers, the purpose of 
which is to prevent the layoffs of employees. Changes in the 
regulations make it possible to subsidize such activities with 
the resources of the Labor Fund. 
  2. Changes in the structure of education will be 
intensified. 
As a result, the share of young people educated in high schools 
and universities will increase, whereas the share of vocational 
schools will decrease. 
  Changes in the system of social protection for the 
unemployed 
will aim to increase the effectiveness of social protection and 
decrease its antimotivational effects. The following measures 
will be taken: 
  1. The modification of the principles of providing benefits; 
it will to a greater degree take into account the variation of 
the situations at local labor markets, as well as the material 
situation of the family of an unemployed person. The prolonging 
of the period over which the benefit is received in areas 
particularly threatened by unemployment will be accompanied by a 
shortening of this period in areas where the situation in the 
labor market is relatively good. 
  2. A change in the conditions of providing benefits and 
registering the unemployed. Unemployed people who refuse to 
accept an offered job or training will be denied the right to 
benefits, either permanently or over a period of time. 
  3. The introduction of separate unemployment insurance and 
the establishment of a special insurance fund made up of the 
subscriptions of employers and employees, earmarked exclusively 
for unemployment benefits. The establishment of unemployment 
insurance will disburden the state from financing unemployment 
benefits and will make it possible to increase the amount of 
money that can be allocated for active stimulation of 
employment. The introduction of this insurance-related form of 
financing unemployment benefits will demand that the 
subscription be set at the level of 7-7.5 percent of the wage 
fund (with the present scale of unemployment). This issue will 
be resolved together with the reform of the entire sphere of 
social insurance. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. Lack of sufficient progress in the restructuring of the 
economy. 
  2. Populist trends and pressure on excessive wage increases. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  A drop in the unemployment rate. 
  IV. DEVELOPMENT OF RURAL AREAS 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The Polish agricultural sector entered a period of 
transformation with labor efficiency and the effectiveness of 
invested money that are lower than in the developed countries of 
West Europe. The market economy has placed it in a different 
situation: uncertainty over selling prices, the need to look for 
buyers of its products, a considerable decrease in the demand 
for food, as well as increasing prices for machines, expensive 
credits, and high unemployment. This is accompanied by 
old-fashioned structures, including, among others, an 
ineffective system of market establishments. 
  The conviction that the market relations will themselves 
force structural transformations in line with the model--the 
weaker farms will leave the market, the stronger ones will 
produce more efficiently--proved false. The market merely 
strongly diversified the situation of farms regarding the 
possibility of the reproduction of property and the farms' links 
to the market. There is an increasingly clear division of 
agricultural farms into three categories: 

  -  Development-oriented farms, highly efficient, economically 
strong, farms that supply more than 50 percent of food to the 
market. 
  -  Stagnation farms, some of which have a chance, offered 
by the interventionist policy of the state, to modernize and 
move up to the first category (some link agriculture to another 
profession). 
  -  Poor farms, which are withdrawing from the market, 
which are not able to even recreate the used fixed assets and 
guarantee a decent income for the family of the owner. Some of 
them must find other sources of income, related to work outside 
the agricultural sector; others will have to be supported 
socially (the problem of old people). 

  The policy of the state will then have to speed up the 
positive trends that strengthen structural changes in 
agriculture and rural areas. Such trends appeared in the period 
of the transformation and include: rationalization of investment 
and increasing its effectiveness, developing the technical 
infrastructure of rural areas, and giving momentum to foreign 
trade. Agricultural production between 1989 and 1993 decreased 
to a lesser degree than in the other branches of the national 
economy. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  1. A renewal of rural areas--a multifunction development of 
rural areas. Creating new opportunities in rural 
areas--modernization and improvement in the structure of 
agriculture--establishing new jobs in the processing industry, 
other industries, services, trade, in branches associated with 
agriculture, and with advantages that the countryside has to 
offer. 
  2. Orientation of changes taking place in agriculture, 
toward 
future processes that are a result of current changes in the 
EU's agricultural policies and in world trade, without 
constantly looking back or following the model of processes that 
took place several decades ago in other countries and under 
different conditions. 
  3. Development of the socioeconomic infrastructure, the 
cooperative movement, agricultural chambers, a system of stock 
markets. Establishing telephone networks, building new roads, 
and other measures that improve the quality of life in rural 
areas. Agricultural research and counseling. 
  4. Utilizing rural areas' natural advantages. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  Food-management development will be gradually heading in the 
direction of an increased role of food processing and 
distribution. This will be accompanied by strengthening the 
economically strong farms, demonstrating itself in land 
concentration, decreasing the number of farms, and a fall in the 
number of people employed in agriculture. The following are the 
necessary preconditions for these processes to occur and, at the 
same time, a means for stimulating the processes: 
  1. Activation of extra-agricultural activities (changes in 
agriculture may take place mainly through changes in the 
extra-agricultural sector). 
  2. Interventionism that stresses a program of state 
assistance for agriculture for the long term rather than 
immediately. State interventionism will take the form of 
addressed assistance [adresowana pomoc], and it will be most 
active in two areas: 
  --Speeding up structural changes in agriculture 
(modernization). 
  --Establishing new nonagricultural jobs in rural areas 
(rural 
areas' multifunctionality). 
  In the programs establishing new jobs in rural areas, one 
will consider that development of agriculture, food processing, 
services for the rural population, and of alternative income 
sources (for example agrotourism) may not absorb the labor 
surpluses existing in rural areas. Depending on the age 
structure, part of the rural population will be covered by 
various types of education and training or by social assistance. 
  The government will be limiting--gradually but 
persistently--those types of intervention that only preserve the 
inefficient production system or those that preserve old 
structures and delay the process of necessary changes by taking 
upon themselves functions of a social nature. 
  3. Financing agricultural development will be based on: 
  --Farmers' own means. 
  --Commercial credits. 
  --Addressed credits [adresowane kredyty] to be granted on 
the 
basis of preferential principles. 
  --Financial assistance coming from the state, interlinked to 
assistance programs by international institutions and 
organizations. 
  4. Elaborating detailed assistance programs addressed at 
specific types of agricultural farms. In the programs, 
conditions will be defined that will have to be met by farmers 
and their farms in order to be able to use the assistance. 
Widespread availability of so-called cheap agricultural credits 
will be gradually restricted. As a future goal, these credits 
will cover those agricultural farms that, with the state's 
assistance, will go through the transformation process faster 
and will be able to repay the credits while modernizing their 
infrastructure and production processes. 
  5. Financial assistance for agricultural development and 
entrepreneurship in rural areas, especially in the following 
fields: biological progress; agricultural and marketing 
counseling; investments causing a drop in production costs, 
quality improvements, the limiting of food waste, reorientation 
and adaptation of the agricultural sector to market 
requirements, the development of rural and agricultural market 
infrastructures, the development of education and different ways 
of acquiring knowledge that serve to reorient farmers toward 
nonagricultural occupations or that serve to prepare them for an 
occupation. 
  6. Appropriate economic and financial policies that would 
support the program for alleviating unemployment in rural areas 
and that would support local self-government economic 
undertakings and initiatives in that regard. 
  7. Development of vertical integration, especially based on 
its simpler form--that is to say, government-farmers contracts 
for supplying agricultural products [kontraktacja]. This is an 
alternative to imposing central limitations on production. 
History knows no other ways to develop rural areas and 
agriculture but through vertical integration, meaning 
integration of nonagricultural capital with expenditure of 
agricultural work, thus making biological and technical 
progress, and, most importantly, lowering the cost of food 
production and distribution in the entire food chain (beginning 
with the farmer and ending with retail trade). 
  8. Development of all types of counseling that will deal 
with 
popularizing progress, information, and teaching occupational 
skills. 
  9. Government attention to the stability of economic 
policies, especially ones that would encourage people to invest 
in rural areas (a system of tax breaks and other facilitations.) 
  10. Intensification of measures for the sake of regional 
development. The state will take a favorable position on 
decentralization of decisionmaking, and it will speed up the 
transfer of more powers to self-governments than they have 
enjoyed thus far. The concept of multifunctional development of 
rural areas has been tested in West European countries. In 
Poland, it requires initiating a new philosophy of development. 
Its essence can be described as each region finding its own way 
to utilize the region's own local conditions in the best way 
possible and as the necessary reforms stimulating activities by 
rural self-governments. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. Attempts at either conserving the existing agricultural 
structure or making sudden changes. 
  2. A mechanical surrounding of agriculture with protective 
barriers against outside competition, or leaving agriculture 
outside the state's area of responsibility regarding changes 
taking place in agriculture. 
  3. Lack of harmonization of reforms taking place in cities 
with those taking place in rural areas. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  An increase in the role of incomes deriving from 
nonagricultural activities, in overall incomes of the rural 
population. 
  V. INVESTING IN HUMAN CAPITAL 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  An increased significance of investing in man--in his 
knowledge, skills, culture, and environment--is a trait 
characteristic of development of the world's leading countries. 
It constitutes one of the distinguishing marks and a fundamental 
factor of the development of modern economy. Through investments 
in man, a speedy departure from traditional ways of production 
takes place, based on using raw materials, for the sake of 
branches using primarily human skills, knowledge, and so forth. 
These modern branches produce goods of a high degree of 
processability and also services associated with generating, 
processing, and supplying information, as well as meeting 
cultural needs. While, in countries of developed market 
economies, expenditures for investing in man have been rising 
dynamically for several decades (in both public and private 
sectors), in Poland the opposite has been taking place for 
years. In those countries, the participation of expenditures for 
education reaches 8 percent of the national product, while, in 
Poland, it is maintained with great difficulty at a level of 
slightly more than 4 percent. As a result, when it comes to the 
indicator of education of the youth at the high school and 
higher levels, we are one of the last on the list in Europe. 
  The maintaining for many years of low expenditures in 
education and science constitutes today a fundamental barrier to 
restructuring the Polish economy and a factor weakening our 
international competitiveness. Especially now, at the stage of 
overcoming the effects of a deep transformation recession, the 
choice between investing directly in production activity and 
investing in human capital is difficult. But we cannot be 
shortsighted; even though investments in human capital bring 
results only over the long run (on average, after seven to nine 
years), to abandon them now would bring negative results much 
sooner, costing us much more overall. 
  Although foreign investments are a necessary condition for 
our economic development, the enclaves of modernity established 
through those investments will fail to contribute to a general 
growth, if the technologies and organizational solutions applied 
are not transferred to the environment and absorbed by it. But 
this will not happen if, because of lack of investment in human 
capital, neither managers nor employees are able to use these 
models or to creatively adapt them, and if we do not have the 
appropriate innovation potential. 
  There is a strong relationship between investing in man and 
changes in institutions and in social behavior. People with 
higher levels of general education adapt more easily to the 
changing conditions of management and the labor market, 
demonstrate more entrepreneurship and initiative, and are not 
just participants of the transformations but also animate them. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  While assuming that expenditures in human capital, 
especially 
in education, science, culture, and health protection, are 
investments for which one has to wait long to see results but 
are also investments of the highest degree of social 
effectiveness, the government will be creating the proper 
conditions conducive to such investments by both public and 
private subjects. In the implementation of these policies, the 
government has the following goals: 
  1. Widening the scope of education of the youth at the high 
school and university levels. The proportion of elementary 
school graduates who continue their education in high schools 
will increase from 53 percent in 1992 to over 60 percent in 
1997. The number of university students will also be rising, 
which will contribute to an increase in the scholarization 
coefficient of youth between the ages of 20 and 24 at the higher 
education level, to over 20 percent in 1997. 
  2. Stimulating interest on the part of economic units 
[podmioty gospodarcze], through financial facilitations, in 
investing in human capital, especially in financing 
research/implementation measures. 
  3. Stopping the emigration of educated and creative cadres 
and increasing their participation in domestic 
scientific/research and academic institutions. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  The government has already made its initial decisions 
regarding preferential tax treatment for investment activity 
geared toward innovation and technical progress. In addition, 
the government will set in motion the following measures, mainly 
of a financial nature: 
  1. Gradual exclusion from the basis of tax assessment on 
personal income [podstawa opodatkowania] of part of the costs 
borne on investing in human capital. 
  2. Inclusion in the cost of obtaining gross revenue [koszty 
uzyskania przychodow] of teachers and employees of scientific 
and research/developmental units, of part of the costs borne for 
books, professional journals, scientific equipment and its 
software. 
  3. A system of educational credits, subject to remission, 
will be introduced. 
  4. Donations for public educational, scientific, cultural, 
and health protection units will be excluded from the basis of 
tax assessment. 
  5. Over the long run, preferential tax measures for those 
who 
invest in education, science, culture, and health protection 
will be widened. 
  6. Tax breaks have already been widened, and credit 
guarantees have been established for those purchasing and 
assembling equipment and machinery associated with implementing 
licenses and patents and with implementing the results of 
domestic scientific and research/developmental projects. 
  7. A system is being prepared of incentives for economic 
units that establish new foundations (or that support the 
existing ones) that act on behalf of education, science, 
culture, health protection, and the environment. 
  8. Supporting investments in the training of managers and 
employees through: 
  --Widening the cost of obtaining gross revenue to cover some 
costs borne by participants of training sessions. 
  --Directing for that goal a major part of subsidiary means 
at 
the government's disposal. 
  --Negotiating with international organizations over the 
issue 
of transfer of means for managerial/employee training, also for 
the benefit of extragovernmental organizations and of private 
economic units. 
  9. Undertaking financial measures for the sake of 
preferential awarding of outstanding innovators, scientific, 
cultural, and art activists (for instance, popularizing the 
custom that is applied in many countries of establishing and 
financing special professorial appointments for outstanding 
academicians, by large public and private enterprises, with the 
permission of the authorities of the particular university.) 
  10. Widening the scope and size of means for the sake of 
research projects ordered by the Scientific Research Committee, 
in accordance with the government's policy priorities. 
  11. Implementation of already approved segment programs 
[programy odcinkowe] (or of those that are currently being 
worked on), such as "Main Directions of Improving the 
Educational System in Poland," "National Health Program," and 
"The State's Ecological Policies." 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. Succumbing to the pressure of immediate needs, to the 
detriment of the future. 
  2. The appearance of economic barriers in accessing the 
educational system at the level above elementary schools. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  An increase of the proportion of expenditures borne by 
education, science, culture, and health and environmental 
protection in the GDP. 
  VI. MANAGING THE STATE WEALTHAND PROCESSES 
OFOWNERSHIP TRANSFORMATIONS 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The economic transformations are linked to changes in the 
role of the state as the owner. The participation of the 
state-owned sector in the GDP, in production, and in employment 
has been clearly decreasing, even though it continues to be 
significant, and, in some areas of the economy, it is even 
outright determinant. The way of managing state wealth has been 
subject to widespread criticism. Ownership prerogatives are 
exercised by several dozen offices and institutions. A uniform 
representation of the State Treasury is lacking. This blurs the 
issue of responsibility for state-owned property, makes 
supervision and control measures difficult, makes the processes 
of ownership transformations longer than necessary, and makes 
proper management difficult. 
  In exercising ownership functions, the issue of 
privatization 
has gained an unduly major advantage over the issue of effective 
management of state-owned property. That is one of the important 
reasons of the crisis in public finances and of many cases of 
unnecessary bankruptcies by public enterprises deprived of 
ownership assistance. Despite the preferential treatment granted 
to privatization, ownership transformations, even though they 
did score substantial progress, are taking place at a rate that 
is slower than planned. At the same time, there is no wide 
social acceptance for those ways and means of privatization of 
state-owned enterprises that have been implemented up to now. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  1. A clear improvement in the management of state-owned 
property through the establishment of strong, efficient, and 
effective management structures that would be guided by market 
principles of action. The following, among others, will serve 
that goal: 
  --Transformation of constitutive fundamentals of state-owned 
enterprises. 
  --A strengthening of the independence of managements of 
state-owned enterprises, of administrative organs. 
  --A stabilization of the managerial cadre through the 
application of managerial contracts and strong economic 
incentives. 
  --An institutional separation of the State Treasury. 
  2. Defining ownership policies vis-a-vis the basic group of 
state-owned enterprises and State Treasury companies, with the 
goal of eliminating uncertainties, with regard to both 
managements and work forces of enterprises and to investors. The 
government, in cooperation with the interested parties, will 
shortly: 
  --Define areas of the state's vital interests in which state 
administration will exercise direct regulatory functions. 
  --Define a map of measures aimed at bringing units back to 
health [dzialania sanacyjne] in those cases where there are 
chances for a successful restructuring of sectors and 
state-owned enterprises. 
  --Create the right conditions for an effective and speedy 
liquidation and bankruptcy process, which will be conducive to 
rational industrial policies and the establishment of a new type 
of economic ties. 
  3. Continuation of ownership transformations clearly geared 
toward: 
  --Stimulating measures promoting efficiency and the 
improvement of current and predicted economic efficiency. 
  --Demonopolization of the economy, leading to increased 
competitiveness among independent economic units. 
  --Capital concentration in those areas that require such 
measures due to international competition. 
  --Popularization of ownership in society. 
  --Limiting the participation of state-owned property in the 
economy. 
  --Improvement in the short-term and medium-term state of 
state finances. 
  4. Rendering the privatization process prosocial, to make it 
spread beyond the formal distribution of shares or certificates 
among work forces of units being privatized. The government will 
be implementing that intention through, among other means: 
  --Applying property remuneration systems [majatkowe systemy 
wynagradzania] under which work forces could collect part of 
remunerations in the form of shares of the companies they work 
for. 
  --Obtaining social and employment guarantees from investors. 
  --Securing a minimum of participation in the management 
process for work forces of units being privatized. 
  --Securing an obligation in the process of privatization and 
making private investors comply with their obligations to make 
developmental investments in the enterprise acquired by those 
investors. 
  5. A final settlement of issues linked to the so-called 
reprivatization and a simultaneous elimination of uncertainties 
regarding the ownership of many components of domestic wealth. 
The complex social delicacy of this issue (among others, the 
balance between remedying old injustices and causing new ones) 
and also of the state of state finances must be the appropriate 
context for reprivatization policies. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  1. Commercialization of state-owned enterprises and an 
institutionalization of the State Treasury through: 
  --Settling the issue of exercising ownership by the State 
Treasury vis-a-vis state-owned enterprises. 
  --Creating the right conditions for bringing state-owned 
enterprises and State Treasury companies back to health. 
  --Appropriate deployment of the wealth of those enterprises 
in which remedying measures turned out to be ineffective or 
unjustified. 
  --Creating the right conditions for speeding up the 
processes 
of ownership transformations, among others by making it possible 
to conduct installment-based sales of enterprises being 
subjected to capital privatization. 
  --Creating the right conditions for popularizing ownership 
in 
society. 
  --Preparing a law on the State Treasury and establishing a 
separate, central institution that would manage state-owned 
wealth. 
  2. Activation of the Popular Privatization Program by 
establishing National Investment Funds. As a priority, the 
program will cover those state-owned enterprises and State 
Treasury companies that have already been submitted and 
selected. Information and organizational measures will be 
continued with the goal of a gradual extension of the scope of 
the program, while the time frame for activating the program and 
its scope in 1994 and subsequent years will depend on the 
state's financial situation and the size of support for the 
program received from foreign countries. 
  3. Implementation of the 
"Stabilization-Restructuring-Privatization" program, which is 
being implemented with the organizational and financial 
participation of the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development. The program covers enterprises in a particularly 
difficult situation, which will be subjected to a process of 
bringing them back to health. 
  4. Continuation of the process (initiated in 1993) of 
financial restructurings of state-owned enterprises and banks. 
The implementation of a second stage of injecting additional 
capital into commercial banks is being planned for 1994, and 
also extension of the process to cover "bad" credit portfolios 
of more banks (among them, Bank Gospodarki Zywnosciowej, Polska 
Kasa Opieki-Bank Panstwowy, Polska Kasa Opieki S.A.), with a 
simultaneous assessment of the efficiency of the usage of means 
throughout 1993. 
  5. Implementation of a multiyear program of financial, 
wealth-related, and organizational restructuring of sectors of 
particular importance to the economy, like the fuel/energy 
sector, the steel, arms, shipyard, pharmaceutical industries, 
and heavy chemistry. Due to these industries' concentration in 
some regions of the country--which brings about the danger of 
structural unemployment--these programs will be supplemented by 
some derivative programs (programs of regional restructurings, 
raising the level of economic activity, supporting foundation 
privatization, and so forth). 
  6. Privatizing the Polish economy by using all means of 
privatization and decentralization of privatization 
decisionmaking. Among others, the following will take place: 
  --Speeding up of the sale of small and medium-size 
enterprises through a simplification of sale procedures. 
  --Speeding up of transferring small and medium enterprises 
into leasing by employee companies through a simplification of 
the procedures and an easing of the conditions of leasing. 
  --The introduction of a new institution of State Treasury 
companies, with employees or other private investors, which will 
make it possible to conduct partial privatization, with the 
possibility of conducting full privatization in the future, with 
the participation of the same or other investors. 
  7. Speeding up of the process of dissolution of permanently 
ineffective enterprises. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. A slow rate and inefficiency of legislative proceedings. 
  2. Minor demand for enterprises being privatized, especially 
in the case of capital privatization, which would be undertaken 
on a scale wider than heretofore. 
  3. Social fear of privatization and primarily fears on the 
part of employees of enterprises being privatized. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  Improvement in the enterprise profitability ratio. 
  VII. MEDIUM-TERMFINANCIAL STRATEGY 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The government's economic policies must eliminate the 
fundamental weak aspects and impediments to the establishment of 
stable bases of economic growth and stabilization. The situation 
in that regard is mainly defined by: 

  -  A high inflation rate, which also means high nominal 
interest rates that impede investments processes, including in 
the sector of export-bound production and of production that is 
substitutive vis-a-vis imports. 
  -  A low financial potential of the 
economy compared with developmental needs, which means an 
insufficient level of domestic savings that are not increasing 
fast enough, a very limited credit potential of the banking 
system (which is caused by the banks' poor levels of capital, by 
high contribution of so-called bad debts, and by high costs of 
banking services), a big discrepancy between interest rates on 
credits and those on deposits (which is detrimental to both 
saving and investing), and, finally, a shallow financial and 
capital market that is only beginning to develop. 
  -  A high level 
of strongly increasing needs expressed by the budget sector for 
loans that are covered mainly by debts in the banking system. 
This has a negative impact both on reducing inflation and on the 
possibilities of limiting crediting the sector, which means it 
has a doubly negative impact on investments and economic 
growth. 
  -  Replacement of prodevelopmental expenditures borne on 
human capital and on economic infrastructure, with the 
increasing cost of servicing the public debt and with the second 
most dominating item of public expenditures--retirement pensions 
[emerytury], other kinds of pensions [renty], and social 
transfers. Both of these sectors absorb over half of all public 
means spent per year, which, in turn, absorb half the national 
product and, in this way, are a reason for the relatively high 
tax rates in Poland that, in turn, bring about a low potential 
of savings and investments. 
  -  Insufficient dynamism of exports and 
a fast increase in imports, as a result of which the foreign 
trade balance on the sheet of current turnover [obroty biezace] 
is highly negative. And, even though maintaining the level of 
foreign currency reserves does not present major problems (after 
the temporary decline in 1991 and 1994), thanks mainly to the 
relatively high positive balance on the sheet of short-term 
capital turnover, there continue to be no stable bases for a 
stabilization of the balance of payments over the long run. 

  Meeting deadlines for repayment of the foreign debt and for 
servicing the debt's cost requires the development of a sector 
of production of export-bound goods and of goods substitutive 
vis-a-vis imports. This is a key issue in a long-term policy of 
a permanent balance of payment. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  The financial strategy for 1994-97 is subordinated to 
implementing the fundamental goals of the socioeconomic 
program--that is to say, maintaining the rate of real economic 
growth at the level of approximately 5 percent per year, and a 
reduction of the inflation rate to below 10 percent in 1997. The 
existing realities make it necessary for various goals of the 
financial strategy to gain various degrees of importance and 
also to have them spread, in time, in different ways. Some of 
these goals are regarded as of an absolutely priority nature and 
to be reached within a short or medium time period, while the 
implementation of other goals, which are equally important, 
requires a longer time period. That other group of goals of the 
financial strategy also includes some goals whose implementation 
will bring positive and tangible effects for the economy most 
probably not until after 1997. The main goals of the 
government's medium-term financial strategy are: 
  1. Gradual restoration of a balance in the budget sector. 
This will be about reducing the sector's deficit vis-a-vis the 
GDP, from 3.9 percent in 1994 to 2-3 percent in 1997; decreasing 
the ratio of the public debt from over 85 percent of the GDP in 
1993 to 70-75 percent in 1997; and decreasing the cost of 
servicing the internal public debt in relation to an increase of 
the GDP. This will allow for stopping the declining trend of the 
size of bank credits for the nonfinancial sector, and their real 
growth at a rate that would approximate the real GDP growth rate. 
  2. Mobilization of domestic savings and improvements in the 
credit potential of the banking system and also development of 
the financial and capital market, including the establishment of 
a specialized savings-and-loan system for housing purposes. But 
the significant effects of this will not be visible until the 
long term. 
  3. Lowering of the level (measured by its relation to the 
GDP) and a change of the structure of public expenditures and of 
the level and structure of taxes. This means that, over 1994-97, 
the rate of real growth of expenditures and incomes will be 
maintained below the rate of growth of the real GDP and the rate 
of real expenditure increases--which will be lower than the real 
rate of growth of incomes. 
  4. An increase of foreign currency reserves of the banking 
system over 1994-97 at the rate approximating the real GDP 
growth (despite a negative foreign trade balance on the sheet of 
current turnover over the entire period until 1997). 
  5. Gradual reduction of the foreign trade deficit in 
relation 
to the GDP, as a result of a real almost one-and-a-half-times' 
growth of exports compared with the growth of the GDP, and as a 
result of the real rate of import growth approximating the rate 
of general economic growth. 
  6. Maintaining a stable situation in the balance of payments 
over the short term, with a very strict observance of deadlines 
for repaying the foreign debt and of servicing it, in accordance 
with decisions reached within the Paris and London Clubs. 
  7. Denomination of the zloty and introduction into 
circulation of new bank notes and coins effective 1 January 
1995, which will affirm the stabilization processes and the 
advancement of the transformations. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  The main tasks and instruments of the financial policies 
will 
be: 
  1. A fall in nominal and real interest rates. The process 
will be influenced by the process of restructuring the banking 
sector and of injecting additional capital into it, which has 
already begun and is being planned for subsequent years, and 
also by a gradual decrease in the rate of mandatory reserves. 
  2. A much lower rate of decline in interest rates on bank 
deposits, compared with interest rates on credits. Investment 
promotion will also be supported by investment breaks [ulgi 
inwestycyjne] on income taxes, while export promotion will be 
supported by a gradual development of a system of insurance and 
guarantees of export credits, along with (in the initial stage) 
guarantees by the state budget. 
  3. Exchange-rate policies will maintain the stable relation 
of the zloty's real value to convertible currencies, while 
observing the principle of a creeping growth in the exchange 
rate, which would continue to decrease along with the inflation 
rate. 
  4. Gradual change of the tax structure aimed at increasing 
the role of indirect taxes in general tax revenue, with a 
gradual decrease of the burden of income taxes, especially 
through a wider application of tax breaks. 
  5. An increased discipline of budget expenditures, including 
a reduction in the cost of servicing the domestic public debt 
and slowing down the excessive rate of growth of expenditures 
borne on retirement pensions, other types of pensions, and 
social transfers. A fundamental role in that regard will be 
played by: 
  --A reform of the social insurance system and the 
establishment of retirement-pension funds. 
  --A change in the principles of indexation of retirement 
pensions and other types of pensions. 
  --A reduction in the cost of social protections, coupled 
with 
aiming to address them at the really most needy social groups. 
  6. A gradual decentralization of the system of public 
finances, leading to strengthening the position of territorial 
self-governments. 
  7. Maintaining the trend of a growing role of the nonbanking 
sector in purchasing Treasury securities. 
  8. Increasing the role of foreigners in purchasing Treasury 
securities. 
  9. A partial change in the structure of creditors in the 
public debt, among others through: 
  --The introduction of indexed forms of debt instruments. 
  --A striving at extending time limits for payment of 
Treasury 
securities. 
  --Facilitation in dealing with securities on the secondary 
market. 
  10. Continuing with the reforms of the Treasury apparatus 
(tax administration). 
  11. At least a partial inclusion in the basis of tax 
assessment ("tax basis") of results of activity in the economic 
gray area. 
  12. Creating a climate conducive to the flow of foreign 
direct investments, primarily in the form of stable tax and 
legal rules. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  The main danger is inflation. Its return or a decrease that 
would be lower than planned in the program will automatically 
mean a decreased reduction of interest rates and worse 
conditions for investment and economic growth. 
  1. Inflation incentives can result from, among others: 
  --An increase in prices of merchandise and services not 
subject to exchange with foreign countries. 
  --Inflation inertia as a result of blocking the change of 
the 
principles of indexation and of slow privatization and 
demonopolization. 
  --Excessive and uncontrolled salary increases. 
  2. A fast and uncontrolled salary increase that would absorb 
profits reached by state-owned enterprises, slow down investment 
activity, and lead (with current rules of indexation of 
retirement pensions and other types of pensions retained) to 
increases in budget expenditures. 
  3. An end to the net flow of foreign currency registered on 
the short-term capital turnover sheet, and a minor inflow of 
direct foreign investments. 
  4. Insufficient progress in reforming the area of public 
expenditures. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  A fall in the relationship of public debt to the GDP. 
  VIII. DEVELOPMENT AND REFORMSOF THE FINANCIAL 
SECTOR 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  Thus far, the transformation process with regard to the 
financial sector in Poland has not disturbed the commercial 
banks' dominating position in the area of collecting savings and 
providing credits for investments and consumption. These banks 
continue to be the fundamental player in the money/credit 
market. Despite the emergence of several dozen privately owned 
banks (including between 10 and 20 with foreign capital) and the 
privatization of several banks that used to be the property of 
the State Treasury, over 80 percent of the banking sector's 
turnover continues to take place in state-owned banks. 
  As a whole, the banking sector is characterized by 
significant underdevelopment. The total assets of all Polish 
banks is much smaller than the total assets of a major Western 
bank, while the ratio of domestic assets of the entire banking 
system to the GDP is just about 20 percent in Poland (in 
developed countries, the ratio is 100 percent or more). The 
underdevelopment of the domestic banking sector is also 
demonstrated by domination by commercial banks (with an almost 
complete lack of mortgage banks, building societies, investment 
banks, and so forth) and by a deep crisis of a large part of 
cooperative banks [banki spoldzielcze] servicing Polish 
agriculture and its environment. 
  Despite considerable progress in putting in order the role 
and tasks of the National Bank of Poland [NBP] vis-a-vis the 
banking sector and in building the NBP's independence, the NBP 
continues to perform money-issuing, supervisory, and ownership 
functions at the same time, which is not good from the point of 
the proper implementation of any of those functions. 
  The Polish insurance sector is characterized by low capital 
levels and considerable monopolization. The State Insurance 
Bureau collects close to 70 percent of insurance premiums, while 
another 15 percent falls to the Warta Insurance and Reinsurance 
Company. The problem of independent supervision over the 
insurance sector continues to be unresolved. A regulated 
securities market is also in its initial stages. It is true 
that, in the 1991-93 period, an infrastructure for the market 
was established (which meets the requirements existing in 
developed securities markets), and a concept of dematerialized 
securities transactions was readapted, but the capitalization of 
companies registered at the Warsaw Securities Stock Market 
continues to be below the level of 5 percent of the GDP. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  The dominant strategic goal for the government is to 
continue 
undertaking measures to develop a strong, diversified, and 
efficient financial system. The system must meet the following 
requirements: 

  -  It must efficiently implement the function of collecting 
savings [oszczednosci] and their effective allocation. 
  -  It must 
discipline the activity of economic units. 
  -  It must effectively 
compete with foreign financial institutions, especially in the 
context of full liberalization of service turnover to be adopted 
effective 1999, in connection with our efforts to join the EU. 
The entirety of the government measures toward the financial 
sector will be subordinated to meeting these fundamental 
criteria: 

  1. Measures will be continued to strengthen the NBP's 
independent position as the state's money-issuing bank and the 
government's financial agent. 
  2. Government policies toward the banking sector will be 
clearly heading in the direction of making its role in the 
process of economic growth more active, through injecting 
additional capital into the banks, improving the security of 
economic transactions, policies for developing competition in 
the market for long-term credits, and so forth. 
  3. Appropriate conditions will be created to prevent 
"returning to bad debts" and to monitor the situation. 
  4. The government will be using domestic banks to a larger 
extent for managing state-owned wealth, for the privatization of 
state-owned enterprises, and for bringing them back to health. 
  5. The government will be persistently working to 
demonopolize the insurance market, without which domestic 
reinsurance companies will not be able to open up the Polish 
market for unrestricted activity by foreign companies, which, 
considering the prospect of our membership in the EU, will have 
to take place over the next few years. 
  6. Active measures will be undertaken to strengthen and 
further develop the capital market to render it capable of 
assuming allocation functions in the economy to an 
ever-increasing degree, while supplementing traditional banking 
mechanisms and instruments, including systems of capital and 
credit accumulation for the purpose of communal infrastructure. 
  7. The government will be conducting an open but selective 
policy of allowing foreign capital into the domestic financial 
sector by supporting the foreign capital's inflow primarily in 
cases of absence of domestic investors. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  The list of strategic goals delineated this way will be 
implemented through specific instruments and means of 
implementation. 
  A. In the banking sector 
  1. Stimulating and supporting the process of consolidation 
of 
commercial banks, to include: 
  --Supporting the process of more efficient banks taking over 
weak banks that are incapable of independent action. 
  --Merging inefficient banks operating in the form of State 
Treasury share companies [spolka akcyjna Skarbu Panstwa] with 
those banks owned by the State Treasury that have demonstrated a 
capability to generate profit and a simultaneous capability to 
raise the real value of their own funds. 
  --Establishing regional and supraregional [ponadregionalne] 
banks. The goal is to have between 10 and 20 of these in Poland. 
  --Developing a network of specialized banks, geared toward 
servicing specific types of activity, unique kinds of markets, 
types of operations, including mortgage systems, the contract 
system, and specialized mortgage banks. 
  2. Measures enabling the injection of additional capital 
into 
banks, both through fiscal instruments and policies for 
collecting dividends, and through specific privatization 
techniques, refinancing techniques, and other forms of financial 
support. 
  3. Ownership transformations in the banking sector will be 
perceived by the government as an instrument enabling an 
efficient allocation of means. Policies in that regard will be 
characterized by a rational approach, within which the choice 
between ownership type and efficiency, if a need for such a 
choice arises, will be made in favor of efficiency. 
  4. Strengthening banks' independence from direct 
intervention 
by administrative authorities. This will be accomplished by, 
among others: 
  --Widespread application of managerial contracts with regard 
to State Treasury banks. 
  --Stabilization of managements and governing boards. 
  --Making the salaries of banking authorities and work forces 
dependent on the financial results achieved. 
  5. While recognizing the role of small and medium-size 
enterprises--and that of local communities--in developmental 
processes and in creating jobs, the government will establish 
legal, organizational, and financial conditions facilitating the 
establishment of a system of guarantees, especially of a local 
dimension. 
  6. A Bank Guarantee Fund [Bankowy Fundusz Gawarancyjny] will 
be established, which will perform the function of a guarantor 
of banking deposits. This will take the burden off the central 
bank and the state budget. 
  B. In the insurance sector 
  1. Conducting measures for the gradual consolidation and 
demonopolization of the insurance sector, among others by 
supporting the process of integration of small insurance 
companies, and the selective policy of granting licenses to 
foreign firms. 
  2. Establishing, out of the Finance Ministry, insurance 
supervision by the end of 1994 and an independent Insurance 
Supervision Office [Urzad Nadzoru Ubezpieczeniowego]. 
  3. Initiating and supporting new institutions of the 
insurance market, using those existing in developed countries as 
a model, among others in connection with the planned 
restructuring of the social insurance system (retirement funds, 
insurance companies, and so forth). 
  4. Putting the system of real estate record keeping, 
land-and-mortgage registers, and multifunction cadastre in 
order, as well as modernizing it. 
  5. Improving the synchronicity between the powers of gminas 
[small administrative units] and the system of financing and 
providing credits to communal investments. 
  C. In the capital market 
  1. Conditions will be established before the end of 1994 for 
the operation of both closed and open (for instance, Pioneer) 
trust funds. 
  2. The government will be supporting entry into the market 
of 
institutional investors other than trust funds: insurance 
companies, retirement funds, and, to some extent, banks, in 
particular those that are geared toward investment activity and 
guaranteeing new issues [emisje]. 
  3. The government will be supporting the establishment of 
venture funds [preceding two words in English] in order to 
diversify the sources of financing for developmental enterprises 
of an increased risk factor, which by definition cannot be 
covered by bank financing. 
  4. Further development of the Warsaw Securities Stock Market 
will be continued. At the same time, measures will be undertaken 
for the purpose of activating a stock exchange for date 
operations [gielda operacji terminowych], with regard to foreign 
currencies and stock market instruments. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. An unskilled implementation of the banking and insurance 
sector's consolidations, where the growth of the sector's 
efficiency, compatability, and progrowth orientation would not 
be activated. 
  2. Losing control over the expansion of foreign subjects 
(supported by their capital strength and technological 
supremacy) and a consequent taking of a number of important 
instruments of economic policies, beyond the borders of the 
country. 
  3. Shortage of domestic capital. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  Maintaining the rate of providing credits to the 
nonfinancial 
sector, at a level that would not be lower than 20 percent of 
the GDP. 
  IX. SECURITY OF ECONOMICTRANSACTIONS AND 
ABSORPTIONOF THE "GRAY AREA" 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  Institutional guarantees for the security of economic 
transactions are an indispensable condition for financing the 
economy in any country. The problem is of particular 
importance--and it acquires additional importance--in a 
situation of a systemwide transformation that is about 
implementation and introduction of market rules for managing 
wealth. The current state of economic, legislative, and 
structural/organizational provisions should be regarded as 
highly inadequate and as being very far from the needs in the 
area. Lack of security of economic transactions is a barrier to 
developing activity for economic units, and, consequently, it 
contributes to a slowdown of the rate of economic growth. 
  Development of a so-called gray area, which demonstrates 
itself both in nonregistration of economic activity and in tax 
frauds, criminal, and corruption acts, is a result and, also, 
through mutual linkages, a reason for the lack of security of 
economic transactions. It is estimated that about 70 percent of 
income for the gray area comes about in units that operate 
legally, while the remaining 30 percent comes from nonregistered 
activity. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  1. Increasing incentives for undertaking active investment 
measures on the part of Polish entrepreneurs. 
  2. Increasing the involvement of foreign subjects in Poland. 
  3. Increasing the volume of tax-derived income, by absorbing 
the gray area through legal economic measures and increasing the 
tax basis instead of increasing tax rates. 
  4. Elimination of the gray area's criminal side. 
<H5>  III. THE MEANS </H5>
  A. In the area of monetary settlements 
  1. Popularizing noncash financial settlements through the 
use 
of bills of exchange and securing the executability of claims 
based on bills of exchange. 
  2. Spreading the use of checks in economic transactions, 
among other ways through the prevention of counterfeit checks, 
and by banks guaranteeing the amounts present in the accounts of 
check issuers; with that goal in mind, the Checking and Bills of 
Exchange Law will be amended by the introduction of a new 
definition and scope of application of banking secrecy. 
  3. Securing the possibility of exchanging information on 
customers, which will mean preventing many crimes in banking, 
check, and bills-of-exchange transactions, as well as an 
increased rate of detection of these crimes. 
  4. Introducing a uniform system of financial settlements 
with 
the use of magnetic cards (including foreign-made ones). 
  5. Introducing a duty upon every economic unit that fulfills 
specific requirements (for example, regarding turnover size) to 
have a bank account, coupled with noncash financial settlements 
in case of every transaction not exceeding 3,000 ECU's. 
  6. Improving the operation of bank noncash financial 
settlements, among others through support rendered for the work 
of the National Financial Settlement Chamber, with the goal of 
introducing a fully automated financial settlement system. 
  7. Introducing guarantees of transaction security among 
banks, of mandatory compliance with deadlines for financial 
settlements, and of setting limits to bank commissions in 
noncash transactions. 
  8. Securing better technical safeguards on valuable items. 
  9. Introducing uniform principles of bookkeeping, through a 
legal act of a high order of importance. 
  10. Introducing institutional barriers to the laundering of 
so-called dirty money. 
  B. In the area of international relations, particularly in 
the state's foreign-currency policies 
  1. Maintaining limitations on capital transfers out of 
Poland 
over the next few years. 
  2. Extending the legal framework for the protection of 
Polish 
investments, through the conclusion of bilateral agreements on 
protecting and supporting investment. 
  3. Developing international tax cooperation based on 
agreements on preventing double taxation. 
  4. Increasing efforts to counteract monopoly practices 
regarding price creation in foreign trade. 
  5. Preventing the illegal transfer of incomes out of Poland. 
  C. In the area of the tax system 
  1. Improving institutional mechanisms in the area of taxes 
on 
merchandise and services (extending the taxes' subject scope and 
application, tightening the tax system, eliminating unfair 
competition, taxing unregistered activity, which will be 
accomplished through a continuously updated and uniform database 
on all taxpayers, the obligation to have cash registers capable 
of registering the tax along with the price of an item [kasy 
fiskalne] in retail trade and other services for the population, 
which will be introduced in stages, improvements in bookkeeping 
and in the circulation of documents, among others with the goal 
of mutual taxpayer identification). 
  2. Enforcing and widening the duty to label merchandise with 
Treasury excise labels [znaki skarbowe akcyz]. 
  3. Widening the scope of investment breaks with regard to 
income tax. 
  4. Establishing a uniform taxpayer registry, based on 
Taxpayer Identification Numbers [NIP], which will ensure the 
reliability of partners. 
  5. Introduction by the Finance Ministry of a comprehensive 
and complete real estate database for fiscal purposes, including 
the value of real estate as the basis for tax assessments, in 
the form of a fiscal cadastre. 
  D. In the area of absorbing and limiting the scope of the 
gray area 
  1. Establishing the appropriate conditions and incentives 
for 
registered firms to reveal their entire income. 
  2. Increasing measures to combat criminal acts (the 
receiving 
of stolen goods, the drug trade, the arms trade, and so forth), 
using the means provided by criminal law and criminal/fiscal law 
and the instruments at the disposal of the police, public 
prosecutors offices, and courts of law. 
  3. Counteracting tax evasion by registered firms (decreasing 
tax and similar burdens to a minimum, failure to record all 
turnover, costs, income, and using transactions of order [umowy 
zlecenia], which result in decreased income for ZUS) through: 
  --Eliminating gaps in the tax law. 
  --Raising the qualifications of employees of the State 
Treasury apparatus (including customs officials), increasing the 
range of powers of control, State Treasury, and customs 
apparatuses, integration of State Treasury and customs services 
within the range of functions of the Finance Ministry. 
  --Registering taxpayers and computerizing the process of 
imposing and enforcing taxes and customs duties. 
  --Enacting a tax law adapted to the conditions of the formal 
tax law. 
  --Establishing an appropriate salary system for employees of 
State Treasury, customs, and supervision services, linking 
salaries to work results. 
  --Supporting the development of tax advisers with a 
persistent implementation of a loss of the right to perform the 
profession in cases of detecting dishonest acts (work is in 
progress on a law on granting licenses to tax advisers). 
  --Combating, with the amended means of criminal law and 
criminal/fiscal law, the most harmful economic crimes. 
  4. Application of a simple tax in the form of a lump-sum 
amount not subject to record keeping, which would be set every 
year in advance, for such small activities as cleaning, taking 
care of children and the sick, private lessons, home services 
(for instance in the form of repairs, overhauls, typing, 
tailoring services, knitting, and so forth), and street and 
bazaar trade. 
  E. In the area of customs duties 
  1. Harmonizing merchandise vocabulary for domestic 
transactions with those with foreign countries, eliminating 
differences in the principles of imposition, execution, and 
enforcement of customs duties, taxes, and introduction of a 
uniform merchandise statistical system run by the Central Office 
of Statistics. 
  2. Increasing supervision over the functioning of customs 
warehouses, with the goal of making it impossible to introduce 
merchandise into the Polish customs zone before making an 
appropriate payment to the state budget. 
  3. Tightening the borders and further improving the 
functioning of customs services throughout the entire country, 
which will limit the extent of transactions involving illegal 
dealing in foreign-made merchandise, especially excise products. 
  F. In the area of other types of measures 
  1. Establishing a deposit insurance institution that would 
operate in the form of a fund guaranteeing bank deposits of 
individuals and economic units. 
  2. Establishing a credit insurance fund with the 
participation of the State Treasury, with the goal of providing 
credit guarantees to small and medium-size enterprises. 
  3. Changing the principles of executability of claims 
[wierzytelnosci] toward securing the appropriate rights duly 
accruing to all creditors, especially public ones. 
  4. Reforming and making uniform the system of extrafiscal 
record keeping of data on economic units (draft laws on issuing 
MONITOR GOSPODARCZY I SADOWY, on amending the Commercial Code 
and the law on economic activity, are being prepared) as well as 
introducing a National Commercial Registry. 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. Delay in the necessary legislative work. 
  2. Lack of persistence in the implementation of a range of 
means presented above. 
  3. Insufficient means for combating economic criminality and 
for the judicial system. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  Widening the scope of the tax basis. 
  X. INTERNATIONAL COMPETITIVENESSOF THE POLISH 
ECONOMY 
<H5>  I. THE DIAGNOSIS </H5>
  The Polish economy's international competitiveness is a 
precondition for the implementation of the intentions described 
in the "Strategy for Poland." This means a need to make exports 
more dynamic (in a situation of a stable real foreign-currency 
exchange rate), which will make it possible to pay for the 
necessary imports and to service the country's foreign debt. 
Such transformations of our economy that would render Polish 
merchandise and services competitive with the growing volume of 
foreign goods in the Polish market are also indispensable. An 
increase in efficiency and the capability of implementing 
efficiency-oriented structural changes are a fundamental 
precondition of competitiveness defined this way. One should 
also remember that competitiveness is linked to, rather than 
conflicting with, the increasing standard of living and the 
increasing employment opportunities. 
  Competitiveness requires building an open economy that would 
utilize various instruments of allocation of assets and of 
attracting foreign capital and technologies. Such a 
competitiveness will not be secured through conventional 
economic policies based exclusively on market allocation 
mechanisms. The Polish economy must become highly competitive on 
a world scale because it continues to be characterized by: 

  -  Relatively high import absorption [importochlonnosc] of 
the economic growth. 
  -  Low export capabilities. 
  -  High foreign debt. 

  In addition, the lifting of customs duties with regard to 
imports of merchandise from the EU effective at the end of 1998, 
and with regard to countries of the European Free Trade 
Association [EFTA] and the Central European Free Trade 
Association [CEFTA] effective at the end of 1997, as well as a 
general lowering of customs rates as a result of the Uruguay 
Round, will lead to increased competition in our market. 
  A deep transformation of the global context of the Polish 
economy's functioning is a very significant argument in favor of 
increased economic competitiveness. The end of a relatively 
simple arrangement of competition between East and West, which 
was replaced with a much more complex arrangement, unequivocal 
efforts to widen economic space at the regional level, 
relatively low dynamics of growth in the world economy, a 
radical decrease of demand for unskilled labor and raw materials 
per production unit, unfavorable trends in terms of trade 
[preceding three words in English], increased protectionism in 
developed countries, increasing competition in world merchandise 
and financial markets, as well as a very clear increase in the 
instability and uncertainty of operation of the international 
economic system--these are the fundamental external factors of 
our development in the current decade, presented in a very 
summarized fashion. 
<H5>  II. THE GOALS </H5>
  1. Building a modern economy that would be characterized by 
a 
significant contribution of exports to the GDP, as well as a 
good position in international trade. 
  2. Establishing the appropriate conditions for attracting 
foreign capital and for its efficient use in the process of 
development. 
  3. Creating an appropriate situation for the rational 
integration of the Polish economy with the world economy (EU, 
EFTA, CEFTA), as well as securing the economy's institutional 
presence in the system of international cooperation. 
  4. Making efforts to limit--in a situation of a gradual and 
rational liberalization--the deficit in the balance of the 
current turnover of balance of payments [rachunek obrotow 
biezacych bilansu platniczego] over the medium term. This is a 
factor for strengthening the country's international position, 
including primarily its position in financial markets. 
  5. Increasing the Polish economy's absorption capabilities 
with regard to outside financial means. 
  6. Rationalizing foreign financial relations through 
renegotiations of existing credit agreements in those cases 
where it is justifiable. 
  7. Striving at changes in the organization of foreign 
assistance: increasing the role of the Polish side in defining 
lists of priorities and devoting an ever-increasing amount of 
means for investment projects. 
  8. Applying types of foreign sources of financing other than 
credits and investment capital (for instance, placing financial 
instruments in foreign countries). 
  9. Observing the principle that lessening burdens existing 
at 
a specific time must not take place at the cost of increasing 
some obligations that would substantially limit the country's 
future developmental possibilities. 
  10. Establishing the appropriate conditions for 
intensification of economic cooperation with countries of 
Central and East Europe, countries of the former USSR, and 
countries of Asia and Latin America, particularly those with 
whom Poland enjoyed good and productive economic relations. 
Achieving an export dynamism, which is necessary for 
guaranteeing a high rate of economic growth, is not possible 
with the current geographical structure of exchange with foreign 
countries. 
<H5>  IV. [as published] THE MEANS </H5>
  1. Persistent implementation of such already existing 
programs of action as: a time frame for work associated with the 
implementation of the state's proexport policies, programs 
supporting Eastern policies, fundamental principles of policies 
of economic cooperation with countries of the former USSR, East 
and Central Europe, and China. 
  2. The undertaking and intensifying of work on programs 
relating in particular to issues such as: 
  --Proexport transformations in industry, agriculture, and 
other branches of the economy. 
  --The Polish economy's capabilities to effectively absorb 
outside sources of financing development. 
  --Opportunities for improved utilization of special economic 
zones, including free customs areas. 
  --Adaptations associated with the consequences of Poland's 
increasing participation in international economic structures 
(EU, CEFTA, OECD, GATT-WTO [GATT-World Trade Organization]). 
  3. Continuation of the network of treaty-based agreements, 
which makes it possible for Polish and foreign economic units to 
cooperate with one another, with the goal of a geographic 
widening of markets. 
  4. Popularization of international standards and norms, and 
conclusion of international agreements on cooperation in science 
and technology. 
  5. Continuation of negotiations with countries of West 
Europe 
regarding increasing their openness to Polish merchandise and 
eliminating protectionist practices. 
  6. Elaboration of concepts for the development of trade and 
cooperation with the countries of East Europe, including, in 
particular, a concept for a system of financial settlements, 
which is a precondition for an efficient application of export 
guarantees and insurances. 
  7. Intensification of the promotion of exports, especially 
to 
European countries, and also to China, Japan, India, countries 
of Asia and the Pacific, Latin America, the Middle East, and 
some African countries. 
  8. The speeding up of legislative work on a law concerning 
insurance on export contracts. This will make it possible to 
insure payments for exported goods from nontrade risk, and also 
to widen guarantee and insurance activities in the financing of 
export transactions. The Corporation for Export Credit Insurance 
[KUKE] will become a key element in the system of financing 
exports. KUKE will be provided with substantial budget and 
extrabudget financial means. Governmental guarantees for export 
activities, especially with regard to exports of investment 
goods, will be an important element in the system of financial 
support to exports. Implementation of the law will close a 
fundamental chapter in the establishing of a financial structure 
for supporting exports, using mechanisms in effect in over 60 
countries around the world for a long time, as a model. 
  9. Preparation of a draft law on insuring export credits 
against nontrade risk, as well as strengthening and enlarging 
KUKE. The new legislative guarantees will make it possible to 
widen activities supporting the development of Polish economic 
units, in cooperation with commercial financial institutions in 
both Poland and abroad. As early as 1994, an increase in KUKE's 
share capital by 165 billion zlotys will take place--this will 
happen with the use of state budget means. This additional 
financing of KUKE will be further increased throughout the 
subsequent years. Apart from financial means coming from the 
state budget, KUKE's capital will be using untapped means of 
foreign trade enterprises, banks, and other economic units. In 
justified cases, the possibility of supporting exports with 
government guarantees for export credits is envisioned. 
  10. Intensification of research/developmental and 
implementation-related activities, which will be stimulated, 
supported, and also partially directed by the government. 
  11. Stimulation of changes in the structure of imports in a 
way that would provide for an increased role of investment 
goods, with a simultaneous decrease of the role of consumption 
goods, especially of those goods that can be produced 
domestically. 
  12. Using tariff and extratariff opportunities that, through 
a regulation of the structure of imports, will lead to 
protection of the domestic market against unfair competition 
(antidumping measures, granting licenses for imports of 
sensitive merchandise, compensatory payments, increasing 
sanitary and veterinarian controls at the border, and so on). 
<H5>  IV. THE DANGERS </H5>
  1. An increase of autarkical trends. 
  2. Insufficient progress in economic restructurization. 
  3. Trade restrictions on Polish-made goods. 
  4. Political destabilization preventing foreign capital from 
flowing into Poland. 
<H5>  V. THE MAIN CRITERION OF EXECUTION </H5>
  Export growth exceeding the growth of the GDP. 

